dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="झोप/णे__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>णे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ाल</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>्यावर</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ल्यावर</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ून</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूच</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायचा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायचे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ण्याची</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>लास</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="आवड/णे__vblex">
      <e><p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>णार</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ल</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ायचा</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ायचे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ण्याची</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>लास</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="आणणे"><i>आण</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आवडणे"><i>आवड</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उचलणे"><i>उचल</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐकणे"><i>ऐक</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कळणे"><i>कळ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घुसणे"><i>घुस</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चालणे"><i>चाल</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चिकटणे"><i>चिकट</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झोपणे"><i>झोप</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थांबणे"><i>थांब</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थांबवणे"><i>थांबव</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="धरणे"><i>धर</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कळणे"><i>निघ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पडणे"><i>पड</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पळणे"><i>पळ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पुसणे"><i>पुस</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बघणे"><i>बघ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनणे"><i>बन</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनवणे"><i>बनव</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बसणे"><i>बस</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बोलणे"><i>बोल</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मारणे"><i>मार</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मिळणे"><i>मिळ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मोजणे"><i>मोज</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="म्हणणे"><i>म्हण</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="येणे"><i>ये</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रडणे"><i>रड</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लागणे"><i>लाग</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लावणे"><i>लाव</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वळणे"><i>वळ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वाटणे"><i>वाट</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="समजणे"><i>समज</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सापडणे"><i>सापड</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सांगणे"><i>सांग</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोडणे"><i>सोड</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="संभाळणे"><i>संभाळ</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हसणे"><i>हस</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
